Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 8
DISSOLUTION

Editor's note:

For common law fiduciary duty of good faith, sound business judgment, candor, forthrightness, and fairness owed by a general partner to his limited partners in winding up partnership affairs, see Herald Co. v. Bonfils, 315 F.Supp. 497 (D. Colo. 1970), rev'd on other grounds sub nom. Herald Co. v. Seawell, 472 F.2d 1081 (10th Cir. 1972) and Roeschlein v. Watkins, 686 P.2d 1347 (Colo. App. 1984).

7-62-801. Dissolution - general rules.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

At the time or upon the happening of events stated in writing in the partnership agreement;

Written consent of all partners;

Except as otherwise provided in the written provisions of a partnership agreement, written consent of a majority of the limited partners within ninety days after an event of withdrawal of the last remaining general partner; and

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under section 7-62-802.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 446, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 457, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1501, § 8, effective June 3.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2247, § 141, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-802. Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the partnership's principal office is located, or, if the partnership has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the partnership has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2247, § 142, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-803. Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners may wind up the limited partnership's affairs; except that, upon cause shown, the district court for the county in this state in which the street address of the limited partnership's principal office is located, or, if the limited partnership has no principal office in this state, the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the limited partnership has no registered agent, the district court for the city and county of Denver may wind up the limited partnership's affairs upon application of any partner, the partner's legal representative, or the partner's assignee.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2247, § 143, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1446, § 145, effective July 1.

7-62-804. Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under section 7-62-601 or 7-62-604;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under section 7-62-601 or 7-62-604;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners for the return of their contributions and respecting their partnership interests in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 447, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-805. Domestic entity names - dissolution - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 953, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)